Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1745
Marketing plan contract; execution of certain notes prohibited.

No seller-assisted marketing plan contract shall require or entail the execution of any note or series of notes by the purchaser which, when separately negotiated, will cut off as to third parties any right of action or defense which the purchaser may have against the seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 45.